fr: Position du capteur d’oxygène du véhicule: Aval (post-catalyseur); Autre/non spécifié; Ensemble amont et aval; Amont (pré-catalyseur); Autre
bg-BG: Позиция на кислородния сензор на моторно превозно средство: След катализатора (downstream); Друго/неуточнено; Комплект преди и след катализатора; Преди катализатора (upstream); Друго
hr-HR: Položaj lambda sonde u motornom vozilu: Iza (nakon katalizatora); Ostalo/nespecificirano; Komplet senzora prije i poslije katalizatora; Ispred (prije katalizatora); Ostalo
es: Posición del sensor de oxígeno del vehículo a motor: Posterior (después del catalizador); Otro/no especificado; Conjunto anterior y posterior; Anterior (antes del catalizador); Otro
pt-PT: posição do sensor de oxigénio do veículo motorizado: A jusante (pós-catalisador); Outro/não especificado; Conjunto a montante e a jusante; A montante (pré-catalisador); Outro
lt-LT: Motorinės transporto priemonės deguonies jutiklio padėtis: Už katalizatoriaus; Kita / nenurodyta; Prieš ir už katalizatoriaus montuojamas rinkinys; Prieš katalizatorių; Kita
sk-SK: Poloha kyslíkového senzora v motorovom vozidle: Za katalyzátorom; Iné/nešpecifikované; Súprava pred a za katalyzátorom; Pred katalyzátorom; Iné
ro-RO: Poziția senzorului de oxigen pentru vehicule: În aval (post-catalizator); Altele/nespecificat; Set în amonte și în aval; În amonte (pre-catalizator); Altele
pl: Pozycja czujnika tlenu w pojeździe silnikowym: Za katalizatorem; Inne / nie określono; Zestaw przed i za katalizatorem; Przed katalizatorem; Inne
hu: Gépjármű oxigénérzékelőjének elhelyezkedése: Katalizátor utáni (downstream); Egyéb/nincs megadva; Katalizátor előtti és utáni készlet; Katalizátor előtti (upstream); Egyéb
pt-BR: Veículo automotor sensor de oxigênio posição: Pós-catalisador (downstream); Outros/não especificado; Conjunto pré e pós-catalisador; Pré-catalisador (upstream); Outros
ja: 自動車用酸素センサーの位置: 下流 (触媒後); その他/指定なし; 上流・下流セット; 上流 (触媒前); その他
vi: Vị trí cảm biến oxy của xe cơ giới: Phía sau (sau bầu xúc tác); Khác/Không xác định; Bộ phía trước và phía sau; Phía trước (trước bầu xúc tác); Khác
th: ตำแหน่งเซ็นเซอร์ออกซิเจนในรถยนต์: ขาออก (หลังเครื่องฟอกไอเสีย); อื่นๆ/ไม่ระบุ; ชุดขาเข้าและขาออก; ขาเข้า (ก่อนเครื่องฟอกไอเสีย); อื่นๆ
nl: Motorvoertuig zuurstofsensor positie: Stroomafwaarts (na katalysator); Overig/niet gespecificeerd; Set stroomopwaarts en stroomafwaarts; Stroomopwaarts (voor katalysator); Overig
zh-CN: 机动车氧传感器位置: 下游（催化转化器后）; 其他/未指定; 上游和下游套装; 上游（催化转化器前）; 其他
ru: Положение кислородного датчика автомобиля: Нижний (после катализатора); Другое / не указано; Комплект из верхнего и нижнего; Верхний (до катализатора); Другое
it: Posizione del sensore di ossigeno per veicoli a motore: A valle (post-catalizzatore); Altro/non specificato; Set a monte e a valle; A monte (pre-catalizzatore); Altro
zh-TW: 車用含氧感測器位置: 下游 (觸媒轉換器後); 其他/未指定; 上游與下游套組; 上游 (觸媒轉換器前); 其他
da: Position af lambdasensor i motorkøretøjet: Downstream (efter katalysator); Andet/ikke angivet; Sæt til upstream og downstream; Upstream (før katalysator); Andet
tr: Motorlu taşıt oksijen sensörü konumu: Çıkış (katalizör sonrası); Diğer/Belirtilmemiş; Giriş ve çıkış seti; Giriş (katalizör öncesi); Diğer
sv: Position för lambdasensor i motorfordon: Nedströms (efter katalysator); Övrigt/ospecificerat; Set uppströms och nedströms; Uppströms (före katalysator); Övrigt
fi: Ajoneuvon happianturin sijainti: Alavirta (katalysaattorin jälkeen); Muu/määrittelemätön; Ylä- ja alavirtasarja; Ylävirta (ennen katalysaattoria); Muu
ko: 자동차 산소 센서 위치: 다운스트림(촉매 후); 기타/지정되지 않음; 업스트림 및 다운스트림 세트; 업스트림(촉매 전); 기타
nb: Plassering av lambdasensor: Nedstrøms (etter katalysator); Annet / ikke spesifisert; Oppstrøms- og nedstrømssett; Oppstrøms (før katalysator); Annet
en: Motor vehicle oxygen sensor position: Downstream (post-catalyst); Other/unspecified; Upstream & downstream set; Upstream (pre-catalyst); Other
cs: Poloha lambda sondy v motorovém vozidle: Za katalyzátorem (downstream); Jiné/nespecifikováno; Sada před a za katalyzátorem; Před katalyzátorem (upstream); Jiné
de: Position des Sauerstoffsensors im Kraftfahrzeug: Nachgeschaltet (nach Katalysator); Sonstige/nicht angegeben; Vor- und Nach-Kat-Set; Vorgeschaltet (vor Katalysator); Sonstige
el: Θέση αισθητήρα οξυγόνου μηχανοκίνητου οχήματος: Κατάντη (μετά τον καταλύτη); Άλλο/μη καθορισμένο; Σετ ανάντη και κατάντη; Ανάντη (πριν τον καταλύτη); Άλλο
sl-SI: Položaj lambda sonde motornega vozila: Za katalizatorjem; Drugo/neopredeljeno; Garnitura pred katalizatorjem in za njim; Pred katalizatorjem; Drugo